Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions  of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), a con-
struction contractor license renewal  fee of $400, adopted by the Construction Contractors
Board and approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, is approved.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate May 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5510 (SB 5510-INTRO) Page 1